fr: Type de pratique du wingfoil: Polyvalent; Big Air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Light wind; Race; Speed; Surf; Vague; Autre
sl-SI: Slog krila: Vsestransko; Big air; Z vetrom; Freeride; Freestyle; Rahel veter; Tekmovanje; Hitrost; Surfanje; Valovi; Drugo
pl: Styl wingfoilingu: Wszechstronny; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Słaby wiatr; Race; Speed; Surf; Wave; Inny
it: Stile di wingfoiling: All-round; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Vento leggero; Race; Speed; Surf; Wave; Altro
th: สไตล์วิงฟอยล์: ออลราวด์; บิ๊กแอร์; ดาวน์วินด์; ฟรีไรด์; ฟรีสไตล์; ลมเบา; แข่งขัน; ความเร็ว; เซิร์ฟ; โต้คลื่น; อื่นๆ
ru: Стиль виндфойлинга: Универсальный; Биг-эйр; Даунвинд; Фрирайд; Фристайл; Лайтвинд; Гоночный; Скоростной; Серф; Вейв; Другое
nl: Wingfoil stijl: Allround; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Lichtweer; Race; Speed; Surf; Wave; Overige
lt-LT: Vėjasparnių stilius: Universalus; Aukštų šuolių (Big air); Pavėjui (Downwind); Laisvojo važiavimo (Freeride); Laisvojo stiliaus (Freestyle); Silpno vėjo; Lenktynių; Greičio; Banglenčių; Bangų; Kita
zh-TW: 水翼風翼風格: 全能; 騰空跳躍 (Big air); 順風; 自由滑行; 花式; 微風; 競速; 速度; 衝浪; 乘浪; 其他
ja: ウィングフォイルスタイル: オールラウンド; ビッグエア; ダウンウィンド; フリーライド; フリースタイル; ライトウィンド; レース; スピード; サーフ; ウェーブ; その他
el: Στυλ Wingfoiling: All-round; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Ελαφρού ανέμου; Αγώνων; Ταχύτητας; Surf; Wave; Άλλο
ko: 윙포일링 방식: 올라운드; 빅 에어; 다운윈드; 프리라이드; 프리스타일; 라이트 윈드; 레이스; 스피드; 서프; 웨이브; 기타
ro-RO: Stilul de wingfoiling: Universal; Big air; Vânt din spate; Freeride; Freestyle; Vânt slab; Cursă; Viteză; Surf; Val; Altele
cs: Styl jízdy na wingfoilu: Univerzální; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Slabý vítr; Race; Rychlost; Surf; Wave; Jiné
de: Wingfoiling-Stil: Allround; Big Air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Leichtwind; Race; Speed; Surf; Wave; Sonstige
es: Estilo de wingfoil: Polivalente; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Light wind; Competición; Velocidad; Surf; Olas; Otro
nb: Wingfoiling-stil: Allround; Big air; Medvind; Freeride; Freestyle; Lett vind; Løp; Hastighet; Surf; Bølge; Annet
sk-SK: Štýl wingfoiling: Univerzálne; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Slabý vietor; Race; Rýchlostné; Surf; Do vĺn; Iné
hu: Wingfoiling stílus: All-round; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Gyenge szeles; Verseny; Sebességi; Surf; Hullámlovas; Egyéb
pt-BR: Wingfoiling estilo: All-round; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Vento fraco; Race; Speed; Surfe; Wave; Outro
bg-BG: Стил на уингфойл: Универсален; Биг еър; Даунуинд; Фрирайд; Фристайл; Слаб вятър; Рейс; Скорост; Сърф; Вълни; Друго
zh-CN: 风翼风格: 全能; 腾空跳跃; 顺风; 自由骑行; 自由式; 微风; 竞速; 速度; 冲浪; 冲浪; 其他
sv: Typ av wingfoiling: Allround; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Lättvind; Race; Speed; Surf; Våg; Övrigt
tr: Wingfoil sürüş stili: Çok yönlü; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Hafif rüzgar; Yarış; Hız; Sörf; Dalga; Diğer
hr-HR: Stil krila: Univerzalno; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Slab vjetar; Utrke; Brzina; Surfanje; Valovi; Ostalo
vi: Kiểu cánh nâng: Toàn diện; Bay cao; Xuôi gió; Trượt tự do (Freeride); Thể hiện kỹ năng (Freestyle); Gió nhẹ; Đua; Tốc độ; Lướt sóng; Lướt sóng; Khác
fi: Siipilautailutyyli: Yleiskäyttö; Big air; Myötätuuli; Freeride; Freestyle; Kevyt tuuli; Race; Nopeus; Surf; Wave; Muu
en: Wingfoiling style: All-round; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Light wind; Race; Speed; Surf; Wave; Other
pt-PT: Estilo de wingfoil: Versátil; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Vento fraco; Corrida; Velocidade; Surf; Onda; Outro
da: Wingfoiling-stil: All-round; Big air; Downwind; Freeride; Freestyle; Light wind; Race; Speed; Surf; Wave; Andet